Maine, session 132, LD1076.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 20-A MRSA §6556-A is enacted to read:
§6556-A. School security officers
A municipal police department or a county sheriff's office may contract for the services
of a school security officer as needed on a per diem basis to provide school security-related
functions and services. For the purposes of this section, "school security officer" has the
same meaning as in Title 25, section 2801-A, subsection 7-B.
Sec. 2. 25 MRSA §2801-A, sub-§7-B is enacted to read:
7-B. School security officer. "School security officer" means a law enforcement
officer who possesses a current and valid certificate issued by the board pursuant to section
2803‑A, subsection 8-E and is employed by a nonfederal employer to provide security and
protection to students and personnel of public schools.
Sec. 3. 25 MRSA §2801-B, sub-§1, ¶K, as corrected by RR 2005, c. 1, §9, is
amended to read:
K. A contract officer appointed by the Commissioner of Public Safety pursuant to Title
28‑A, section 82‑A; or
Sec. 4. 25 MRSA §2801-B, sub-§1, ¶L, as reallocated by RR 2005, c. 1, §10, is
amended to read:
L. A transport officer.; or
Sec. 5. 25 MRSA §2801-B, sub-§1, ¶M is enacted to read:
M. A school security officer.
Sec. 6. 25 MRSA §2803-A, sub-§8-E is enacted to read:
8-E. Training of school security officers. To establish certification standards and a
preservice and in-service training program for school security officers. This program must
include:
A. Preservice law enforcement training under section 2804-B;
B. An additional school security officer training program developed and approved by
the board that is specific to the duties of a school security officer; and
C. In-service law enforcement training that is specifically approved by the board as
prescribed in section 2804-O;
Sec. 7. 25 MRSA §2804-O is enacted to read:
§2804-O. Law enforcement training for school security officers
As a condition to the continued employment of any person as a school security officer,
that person must successfully complete, within the first 12 months of employment, the
training required under section 2803-A, subsection 8-E. Thereafter, as a condition of
continued employment as a school security officer, the school security officer must
satisfactorily maintain the school security officer certification by completing recertification
requirements prescribed by the board. The board, under extenuating and emergency
circumstances in individual cases, may extend that period for not more than 180 days.
Page 1 - 132LR1535(01)